Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 12 Dissolution of Electric Membership Corporations

46-3-420.
Commencement of proceedings for voluntary dissolution of an electric membership corporation generally.

An electric membership corporation may be dissolved by the act of the electric membership corporation when authorized in the following manner:

The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the electric membership corporation be dissolved and directing that the question of such dissolution be submitted to a vote at a meeting of the members, which may be either an annual or a special meeting;

Written notice shall be given to each member not less than 30 days before such meeting, in the manner provided in Code Section 46-3-263 for the giving of notice of meetings of members and, regardless of whether the meeting is an annual or a special meeting, shall state that the purpose or one of the purposes of such meeting is to consider the advisability of dissolving the electric membership corporation. Such written notice shall also be mailed, on the earliest date such notice is given to any member of the electric membership corporation, to any person who supplies retail electric service in this state and who has a contract with the electric membership corporation under which it is entitled to any of the output of or to be served by any facility owned in whole or in part by the electric membership corporation. If the electric membership corporation provides retail service, notice that dissolution is proposed and of the time and place of the proposed meeting of members for the purpose of voting on dissolution shall be delivered not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days before such meeting to the publisher of each newspaper which is the official organ of each county in which the electric membership corporation provides service or to the publisher of one or more newspapers of general circulation published within each such county whose most recently published annual statement of ownership and circulation reflects a minimum of 60 percent paid circulation, together with a check, draft, or money order in the amount of $15.00 in payment of the cost of publishing such notice and a request that such notice be published one time as soon as practicable but, in any event, within ten days after receipt of the notice by the newspaper. Such notice shall be published by each newspaper within ten days of its receipt of the notice; but failure of any newspaper to comply with such publication requirement shall not affect the validity of the meeting of members at which dissolution is approved;

At such meeting, a vote of the members entitled to vote thereat shall be taken on a resolution to dissolve the electric membership corporation. The resolution may fix the time within which the statement of intent to dissolve, required by this article, shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and also may authorize the board to abandon dissolution proceedings and to file a statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings without further member action. Such resolution shall be adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the electric membership corporation;

Upon the adoption of such resolution, a statement of intent to dissolve shall be executed by the electric membership corporation as provided in Code Section 46-3-173, which statement shall set forth:

The name of the electric membership corporation and its date and county of incorporation;

The names and respective addresses of its officers;

The names and respective addresses of its directors;

A copy of the resolution adopted by the members authorizing the dissolution of the electric membership corporation; and

The member vote required to adopt the resolution to dissolve the electric membership corporation, the number of members entitled to vote, and the vote for the resolution.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 16; Code 1933, § 34C-1201, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-421.
Filing of statement of intent to dissolve with Secretary of State and state revenue commissioner.

The statement of intent to dissolve shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in Code Section 46-3-174. The electric membership corporation shall also forward a copy of such statement to the state revenue commissioner for filing.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1202, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-422.
Effect of filing of statement of intent to dissolve.

Upon the filing by the Secretary of State of a statement of intent to dissolve, the electric membership corporation shall cease to carry on its business, except insofar as may be necessary or appropriate for the winding up thereof; but its corporate existence shall continue until the time provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 46-3-428.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1203, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-423.
Procedure after filing statement of intent to dissolve.

The electric membership corporation shall immediately cause notice of its intent to dissolve to be published in a newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located or which is a newspaper of general circulation published within that county whose most recently published annual statement of ownership and circulation reflects a minimum of 60 percent paid circulation. This notice shall be published four times in the newspaper and shall be in substantially the following form:

A Statement of Intent to Dissolve
_______________
(name of electric membership corporation), a Georgia electric membership corporation with registered office at
_______________
(address of registered office), has been delivered to the Secretary of State by said electric membership corporation and filed by him on
_______________ ,
_______________
(month, day, and year), in accordance with the applicable provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the “Georgia Electric Membership Corporation Act.”

The electric membership corporation shall proceed to collect its assets; convey and dispose of such of its properties as are not to be distributed in kind to its members and former members; pay, satisfy, and discharge its liabilities and obligations; and do all other acts required to liquidate its business and affairs and, after paying or adequately providing for the payment of all its obligations, distribute the remainder of its assets, either in cash or in kind, among its members and former members according to their respective rights and interests as such rights and interests are established under the articles of incorporation and bylaws.

The electric membership corporation, at any time during the liquidation of its business and affairs, may make application to the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is situated to have the liquidation continued under the supervision of the court as provided in Code Section 46-3-431.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1204, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 46.

46-3-424.
Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings by electric membership corporation.

An electric membership corporation may, at any time prior to the issuance of a certificate of dissolution by the Secretary of State as provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 46-3-428, revoke voluntary dissolution proceedings theretofore taken, in the following manner:

The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the voluntary dissolution proceedings be revoked and directing that the question of such revocation be submitted to a vote at a special meeting of members;

Written notice, stating that the purpose or one of the purposes of such meeting is to consider the advisability of revoking the voluntary dissolution proceedings, shall be given to each member within the time and in the manner provided in Code Section 46-3-263 for the giving of notice of special meetings of members;

At such meeting, a vote of the members shall be taken on a resolution to revoke voluntary dissolution proceedings, which resolution shall require for its adoption the affirmative vote of a majority of all the members;

Upon the adoption of such resolution, a statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be executed by the electric membership corporation as provided in this article, which statement shall set forth:

The name of the electric membership corporation;

The names and respective addresses of its officers;

The names and respective addresses of its directors;

A copy of the resolution adopted by the members revoking the voluntary dissolution proceedings; and

The member vote required to adopt the resolution to revoke voluntary dissolution proceedings, the number of members entitled to vote, and the vote for the resolution;

If the board has been authorized, in the original resolution to dissolve the electric membership corporation adopted by the members, to abandon dissolution proceedings and to file a statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings without further member action, then this statement shall be executed by the electric membership corporation as provided in Code Section 46-3-173 upon the adoption by the board of a resolution recommending that the voluntary dissolution proceedings be revoked. In such case, the statement shall set forth a copy of the resolution adopted by the board and shall briefly state why action by the members was not required; but the statement need not be responsive to subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (4) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1205, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 46.

46-3-425.
Filing of statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings with Secretary of State.

The statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in Code Section 46-3-174.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1206, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-426.
Effect of filing of statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings.

Upon the filing by the Secretary of State of a statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings, the revocation of the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall become effective and the electric membership corporation may again carry on its business.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1207, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-427.
Execution of articles of dissolution; contents of articles of dissolution.

If voluntary dissolution proceedings under Code Section 46-3-420 have not been revoked, then when all debts, liabilities, and obligations of the electric membership corporation have been paid and discharged, or adequate provision has been made therefor, and all of the remaining property and assets of the electric membership corporation have been distributed to its members and former members, or adequate provision has been made therefor, articles of dissolution shall be executed by the electric membership corporation as provided in Code Section 46-3-173, which articles shall set forth:

The name of the electric membership corporation;

That the Secretary of State has theretofore filed a statement of intent to dissolve the electric membership corporation and the date on which such statement was filed;

That all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the electric membership corporation have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made therefor;

That all remaining property and assets of the electric membership corporation have been distributed among its members and former members in accordance with their respective rights and interests, or that adequate provision has been made therefor, or that such property and assets have been deposited with the Office of the State Treasurer as provided in Code Section 46-3-438; and

That there are no actions pending against the electric membership corporation in any court or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order, or decree which may be entered against it in any pending action.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1208, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 230, § 2/SB 175; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” for “Department of Administrative Services” in paragraph (4).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Office of the State Treasurer” for “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” near the end of paragraph (4).

46-3-428.
Filing of articles of dissolution with Secretary of State; procedure involving filing, issuance, and rejection of certificate of dissolution; time of cessation of existence of electric membership corporation.

The electric membership corporation shall cause the original articles of dissolution and two conformed copies of the articles to be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174.

Together with the articles of dissolution, the electric membership corporation shall cause to be delivered to the Secretary of State:

The electric membership corporation’s certification that all tax returns which were due the state on the day of delivery of the articles of dissolution to the Secretary of State have been filed, such certification to be attached to the articles;

Payment to the Secretary of State of the fee provided for in Code Section 46-3-501; and

A check, draft, or money order in the amount of $16.00, payable to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located on the day of delivery of the articles of dissolution to the Secretary of State, in payment of the cost of filing the articles of dissolution in the county.

Upon delivery of the articles of dissolution to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall affix thereon the hour, day, month, and year of delivery. Not later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery, the Secretary of State shall either issue a certificate of dissolution in the manner provided in this Code section or reject the articles in the manner provided in this Code section.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of dissolution appear to be in proper form for filing and are accompanied by the other items required by subsection (b) of this Code section, he shall, in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174:

Issue a certificate of dissolution which shall state that the electric membership corporation has been dissolved by the filing of articles of dissolution in the office of the Secretary of State and the fees paid therefor, as provided by law, and attach the certificate to one conformed copy of the articles of dissolution;

Return the certificate of dissolution with the conformed copy of the articles of dissolution attached thereto to the electric membership corporation or its representative. A copy of the certificate of dissolution shall be attached to the original articles of dissolution; and

Forward a conformed copy of the articles of dissolution with a copy of the certificate of dissolution attached thereto, along with the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section, to the clerk of the superior court in the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located, within four business days after the articles of dissolution have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of dissolution do not appear to be in proper form for filing or are not accompanied by the other items required by subsection (b) of this Code section, he shall reject the articles for filing and shall immediately notify the electric membership corporation or its representative of such rejection by mailing a notice no later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery of the articles of dissolution for filing. This notice shall specify the reason or reasons for rejection of the articles of dissolution; and the articles and all accompanying materials shall be returned therewith.

The conformed copy of the articles of dissolution, with a copy of the certificate of dissolution attached thereto, provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (d) of this Code section shall be filed upon receipt by the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the conformed copy of the articles of dissolution or failure on the part of the clerk of the superior court to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate the issuance of the certificate of dissolution by the Secretary of State.

If the Secretary of State issues a certificate of dissolution, and after the electric membership corporation or its representative has filed a copy of its statement of intent to dissolve with the state revenue commissioner, the existence of the electric membership corporation shall cease as of the time of delivery to the Secretary of State of the articles of dissolution so certified, except for the purpose of court actions, other proceedings, and appropriate corporate actions by members, directors, and officers as provided in Code Section 46-3-439.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1209, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-429.
Commencement of actions for involuntary dissolution of electric membership corporations by superior courts.

If the Secretary of State determines that one of the situations described in subsection (b) of this Code section exists with regard to one or more electric membership corporations, the Secretary of State shall certify to the Attorney General the names of all such electric membership corporations, together with the facts pertinent thereto. Upon receipt of the certification from the Secretary of State, the Attorney General shall mail a notice that such certification has been made, together with a statement of the facts pertinent thereto, to the registered office of the electric membership corporation or, if there is no registered office, to the last known address of the electric membership corporation, or to an officer listed on the most recent annual report filed with the Secretary of State, or, if none is listed, to any officer, director, or incorporator of the electric membership corporation, as shown by the records of the Secretary of State.

In addition to any other remedies provided by law, the electric membership corporation may be dissolved involuntarily by a decree of the superior court in an action filed by the Attorney General 30 days or more after the date of mailing of the notice to the electric membership corporation under subsection (a) of this Code section, when it is established that:

The electric membership corporation procured its articles of incorporation through fraud;

The electric membership corporation has continued, after the written notice by the Attorney General to the electric membership corporation or one of its principal directors or officers, to violate this article in a manner likely to injure the public or the electric membership corporation’s members, creditors, or debtors, except that the Attorney General shall not file such action so long as the electric membership corporation is contesting in good faith, in any appropriate judicial or administrative proceeding, the alleged violation or violations of this article upon which the certification to the Attorney General is based;

The electric membership corporation has been adjudicated bankrupt;

The electric membership corporation has made a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; or

By leave of court, when a receiver has been appointed in any action in which the affairs of the electric membership corporation are to be wound up.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1210, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-430.
Venue and service of process in action for involuntary dissolution.

Every action for the involuntary dissolution of an electric membership corporation shall be commenced in the name of the state by the Attorney General in the superior court of the county in which the last known registered office or principal office of the electric membership corporation, as shown by the records of the Secretary of State, is situated. Process shall issue and be served as in other civil actions.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1211, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-431.
Jurisdiction of court to liquidate assets and business of electric membership corporation.

The superior courts shall have full power to liquidate the assets and business of an electric membership corporation:

In an action by at least 25 members or 10 percent of all of the members of the electric membership corporation, whichever is less, when it is established:

That the directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs and the members are unable to break the deadlock, that irreparable injury to the electric membership corporation is being suffered or is threatened by reason thereof, and that it is impracticable for the court to appoint a provisional director as provided in Code Section 46-3-292 or to continue one in office;

That the acts of the directors or those in control of the electric membership corporation are illegal or fraudulent;

That the members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period which includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election of their successors; or

That the corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted;

In an action by a creditor:

When the claim of the creditor has been reduced to judgment and an execution thereon returned unsatisfied, and it is established that the electric membership corporation is insolvent; or

When the electric membership corporation has admitted in writing that the claim of the creditor is due and owing, and it is established that the electric membership corporation is insolvent; or

Upon application by an electric membership corporation which has filed a statement of intent to dissolve, as provided in Code Section 46-3-420, to have its liquidation continued under the supervision of the court; or

When an action has been filed by the Attorney General to dissolve an electric membership corporation and it is established that liquidation of its business and affairs should precede the entry of a decree of dissolution.

Proceedings under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be brought in the county in which the registered office of the electric membership corporation is situated.

It shall not be necessary to make directors or members parties to any such action or proceeding unless relief is sought against them personally.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1212, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-432.
Procedure in liquidation of electric membership corporation by court.

In proceedings to liquidate the assets and business of an electric membership corporation, the court shall have power to issue injunctions; to appoint a receiver or receivers pendente lite with such powers and duties as the court from time to time may direct; and to take such other actions as may be required to preserve the corporate assets wherever situated and carry on the business of the electric membership corporation until a full hearing can be had.

After a hearing had upon such notice as the court may direct to be given to all parties to the proceedings and to any other parties in interest designated by the court, the court may appoint a liquidating receiver or receivers with authority to collect the assets of the electric membership corporation, including all amounts owing to the electric membership corporation by members. Such liquidating receiver or receivers shall have authority, subject to the order of the court, to sell, convey, and dispose of all or any part of the assets of the electric membership corporation wherever situated, either at public sale or at private sale. The assets of the electric membership corporation or the proceeds resulting from a sale, conveyance, or other disposition thereof shall be applied to the expenses of such liquidation and to the payment of the liabilities and obligations of the electric membership corporation; and any remaining assets or proceeds shall be distributed among its members and former members according to their respective rights and interests. The order appointing such liquidating receiver or receivers shall state their powers and duties. Such powers and duties may be increased or diminished at any time during the proceedings.

The court shall have power to allow from time to time, as expenses of the liquidation, compensation to the receiver or receivers and to attorneys in the proceeding and to direct the payment thereof out of the assets of the electric membership corporation or the proceeds of any sale or disposition of such assets.

A receiver of an electric membership corporation appointed under this Code section shall have authority to sue and defend in all courts in his own name as receiver of such electric membership corporation. The court appointing such receiver shall have exclusive jurisdiction of the electric membership corporation and its property, wherever situated.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1213, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-433.
Qualification of receivers; giving of bond.

A receiver shall in all cases be a citizen of the United States or a corporation authorized to act as receiver, which corporation may be a domestic corporation, either business or nonprofit, or a foreign corporation, either business or nonprofit, authorized to transact business in this state.

A receiver shall in all cases give such bond as the court may direct, with such sureties as the court may require.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1214, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-434.
Filing of claims in liquidation proceedings; effect of failure to file claims.

In proceedings to liquidate the assets and business of an electric membership corporation, the court may require all creditors of the electric membership corporation to file with the clerk of the court or with the receiver, in such form as the court may prescribe, proofs under oath of their respective claims. If the court requires the filing of claims, it shall fix a date, which shall be not less than four months from the date of the order, as the last day for the filing of claims and shall prescribe the notice that shall be given to creditors and claimants of the date so fixed. Prior to the date so fixed, the court may extend the time for the filing of claims. Creditors and claimants failing to file proofs of claim on or before the date so fixed may be barred, by order of court, from participating in the distribution of the assets of the electric membership corporation.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1215, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-435.
Discontinuance of liquidation proceedings.

The liquidation of the assets and business of an electric membership corporation may be discontinued at any time during the liquidation proceedings when it is established that cause for liquidation no longer exists. In such event, the court shall dismiss the proceedings and direct the receiver to redeliver to the electric membership corporation all of its remaining property and assets.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1216, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-436.
Entry of decree of involuntary dissolution; time of cessation of existence of electric membership corporation.

In proceedings to liquidate the assets and business of an electric membership corporation, when the costs and expenses of such proceedings and all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the electric membership corporation have been paid and discharged, or adequate provision has been made therefor, and all of its remaining property and assets distributed to its members or former members, or adequate provision has been made therefor, or such property and assets have been deposited with the Office of the State Treasurer as provided in Code Section 46-3-438, or if its property and assets are not sufficient to satisfy and discharge such costs, expenses, debts, and obligations and all of the property and assets have been applied so far as they will go to their payment, the court shall enter a decree dissolving the electric membership corporation. Upon the filing of the decree with the clerk of the court, the existence of the electric membership corporation shall cease.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1217, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 230, § 2/SB 175; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” for “Department of Administrative Services” in the middle of the first sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Office of the State Treasurer” for “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in the middle of the first sentence.

46-3-437.
Filing of decree of involuntary dissolution; giving of notice of entry of decree.

If the court enters a decree dissolving an electric membership corporation, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court to cause a certified copy of the decree to be filed with the Secretary of State. No fee shall be charged by the Secretary of State for the filing of this certified copy or for giving the notice required by subsection (b) of this Code section.

The Secretary of State shall give notice of the decree dissolving the electric membership corporation and of the date of its entry to:

The clerk of the superior court of the county where the electric membership corporation’s last known registered office or principal office, as shown by the records of the Secretary of State, is situated, if such decree has been entered by the superior court of another county; and

The clerk of the superior court of the county where the electric membership corporation’s articles of incorporation were filed, if such decree has been entered by the superior court of another county.

No fee shall be charged by such clerks for receiving and filing the notice required by this subsection.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1218, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-438.
Deposit with Office of the State Treasurer of amount due unknown, disabled, or unlocatable creditors or members; disposition of unclaimed amounts; time limitation.

Upon the voluntary or involuntary dissolution of an electric membership corporation, the portion of the assets distributable to a creditor or member who is unknown or cannot be found, or who is under disability and has no known representative legally competent to receive such distributive portion, shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the Office of the State Treasurer and shall be paid over to such creditor or member or to his legal representative upon proof satisfactory to the Office of the State Treasurer of his right thereto. After the Office of the State Treasurer has held the unclaimed cash for six months, the Office of the State Treasurer shall pay such cash to the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, to be held without liability for profit or interest until a claim for such cash shall be filed with the Office of the State Treasurer by the parties entitled thereto. No such claim shall be made more than six years after such cash is deposited with the Office of the State Treasurer.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1219, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 230, § 2/SB 175; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” for “Department of Administrative Services” throughout this Code section.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Office of the State Treasurer” for “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” six times throughout this Code section.

46-3-439.
Survival of remedy after dissolution.

The dissolution of an electric membership corporation in any manner, except by a decree of court when the court has supervised the liquidation of the assets and business of the electric membership corporation as provided in this article, shall not take away or impair any remedy available to or against such electric membership corporation or its directors, officers, or members for any right or claim existing, or any liability incurred, prior to such dissolution if an action or other proceeding thereon is pending on the date of such dissolution or is commenced within two years after the date of such dissolution. Any such action or proceeding by or against the electric membership corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the electric membership corporation in its corporate name. The members, directors, and officers shall have power to take such corporate or other action as shall be appropriate to protect such remedy, right, or claim.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1220, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-440.
Revival of electric membership corporation after dissolution by expiration of period of duration.

An electric membership corporation that has been dissolved by the expiration of its period of duration but which has continued in business in ignorance of such expiration may revive its corporate existence by amending its articles of incorporation at any time during a period of 15 years immediately following the expiration date fixed by the articles of incorporation so as to extend its period of duration. As of the effective date of the amendment, the corporate existence shall be deemed to have continued without interruption from the expiration date. If during the period between expiration and revival the name of the electric membership corporation has been assumed, reserved, or registered by any other electric membership corporation, the revived electric membership corporation shall not engage in business until it has amended its articles of incorporation to change its name.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1221, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.